Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.531

Dual high school and college credit for secondary career and technical courses—Agreements.

(1) It is the legislature's intent to recognize and support the work of community and technical colleges, high schools, and skill centers in creating articulation and dual credit agreements for career and technical education students, in part by codifying current practice.

(2) Community and technical colleges shall create agreements with high schools and skill centers to offer dual high school and college credit for secondary career and technical courses. Agreements shall be subject to approval by the chief instructional officer of the college and the principal and the career and technical education director of the high school or the executive director of the skill center.

(3) Community and technical colleges may create dual credit agreements with high schools and skill centers that are located outside the college district boundary or service area.

(4) If a community or technical college has created an agreement with a high school or skill center to offer college credit for a secondary career and technical course, all community and technical colleges shall accept the course for an equal amount of college credit.

[ 2008 c 170 s 108.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2008 c 170: See RCW 28A.700.005.